Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 1. Supreme Court
§ 38. Section 38 repealed effective July 1, 2025. Judicial Masters.

The Administrative Judge may appoint a licensed Vermont lawyer who has been engaged in the practice of law in Vermont for at least the last five years to serve as a Judicial Master. The Judicial Master shall be an employee of the Judiciary and be subject to the Code of Judicial Conduct. A Judicial Master shall not engage in the active practice of law for remuneration while serving in this position. In making this appointment, the Administrative Judge shall apply the criteria and standards for judicial appointments contained in section 601 of this title. The Judicial Master may hear and decide the following matters as designated by the Administrative Judge:

In the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, proceedings in treatment court dockets, as approved by the presiding judge, to assure compliance with court orders, including attendance and participation with a treatment plan, imposition of sanctions and incentives, including incarceration in the course of the program and dismissal from the program due to noncompliance; the Master shall not have authority to accept pleas or to impose sentences, to hear motions to suppress, or to dismiss for lack of a prima facie case.

In the Family Division of the Superior Court, in juvenile proceedings, as approved by the presiding judge, to assure compliance with existing court orders, including attendance and participation in substance abuse, mental health, and other court-ordered counseling; compliance with and modification of parent-child contact; to act as the administrative body to conduct permanency hearings pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 5321(g)

unless a contested permanency hearing becomes necessary; and to provide case management of juvenile proceedings; the Master shall not have the authority to hear temporary care hearings, requests for juvenile protective orders, or hearings on the merits, or to conduct disposition hearings.

In the Family Division of the Superior Court, proceedings, with the approval of the presiding judge, to assure compliance with existing court orders relating to parent-child contact; to act as a Master pursuant to Rule 53 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure where no order has been made pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1758(b)

; and to provide case management of proceedings with 15 V.S.A. chapters 5, 11, 15, and 18; the Master shall not have authority to determine divorce or parentage actions, parental rights and responsibilities, or spousal maintenance or modifications of such orders.

The Judicial Master may be appointed to serve as an acting judge pursuant to subsection 22(b) of this title in any matter in which he or she has not previously acted as a Judicial Master.

The decision of a Judicial Master under this section shall have the same effect as a decision of a Superior judge, except when acting as a Master pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 6, 2016; repealed on July 1, 2025 by

2019, No. 77

, § 25.

§ 39.
Capital budget requests; county courthouses.

On or before October 1 each year, any county requesting capital funds for its courthouse, or court operations, shall submit a request to the Court Administrator.

The Court Administrator shall evaluate requests based on the following criteria:

whether the funding request relates to an emergency that will affect the court operations and the administration of justice;

whether there is a State-owned courthouse in the county that could absorb court activities in lieu of this capital investment;

whether the county consistently has invested in major maintenance in the courthouse;

whether the request relates to a State-mandated function;

whether the request diverts resources of other current Judiciary capital priorities;

whether the request is consistent with the long-term capital needs of the Judiciary, including providing court services adapted to modern needs and requirements; and

any other criteria as deemed appropriate by the Court Administrator.

Based on the criteria described in subsection (b) of this section, the Court Administrator shall make a recommendation to the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services regarding whether the county’s request should be included as part of the Judiciary’s request for capital funding in the Governor’s annual proposed capital budget request.

On or before January 15 of each year, the Court Administrator shall advise the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions of all county requests received and the Court Administrator’s recommendations for the proposed capital budget request.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 31.

§ 40.
Report on temporary employees.

Annually, on or before January 15, the State Court Administrator shall submit a report to the House Committee on General, Housing, and Military Affairs and the House and Senate Committees on Government Operations identifying for each of the two prior calendar years:

the total number of individuals employed by the Judiciary Department on a temporary basis who have worked in excess of 1,280 hours in the prior calendar year, excluding employees identified in

3 V.S.A. § 1011(7)

, (8)(A)-(D), (8)(F)-(G), and (8)(I)-(K);

the total number of temporary positions in which one or more individuals have been employed for a combined total of more than 1,280 hours, excluding positions filled by employees identified in

3 V.S.A. § 1011(7)

, (8)(A)-(D), (8)(F)-(G), and (8)(I)-(K);

the total number of hours worked by each temporary employee identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection; and

the total number of years during which each temporary employee identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection has worked for the Judiciary Department.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 58

, § 6.